Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.410

Elections—Elections to be conducted according to Title 29A RCW.

All school district elections, regular or special, shall be conducted according to the election laws of the state as contained in Title 29A RCW, and in the event of a conflict as to the application of the laws of this title or Title 29A RCW, the latter shall prevail.

[ 2015 c 53 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.521. Prior: 1965 c 123 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.58.521, 28.58.521.]